Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE F. STATE AND LOCAL CONTRACTS AND FUND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 2276. PROHIBITION ON CONTRACTS WITH COMPANIES BOYCOTTING CERTAIN ENERGY COMPANIES

Sec. 2276.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Boycott energy company" has the meaning assigned by Section 809.001.

(2) "Company" has the meaning assigned by Section 809.001, except that the term does not include a sole proprietorship.

(3) "Governmental entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 2251.001.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 529 (S.B. 13), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2274 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(22), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 2276.002. PROVISION REQUIRED IN CONTRACT. (a) This section applies only to a contract that:

(1) is between a governmental entity and a company with 10 or more full-time employees; and

(2) has a value of $100,000 or more that is to be paid wholly or partly from public funds of the governmental entity.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a governmental entity may not enter into a contract with a company for goods or services unless the contract contains a written verification from the company that it:

(1) does not boycott energy companies; and

(2) will not boycott energy companies during the term of the contract.

(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to a governmental entity that determines the requirements of Subsection (b) are inconsistent with the governmental entity's constitutional or statutory duties related to the issuance, incurrence, or management of debt obligations or the deposit, custody, management, borrowing, or investment of funds.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 529 (S.B. 13), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2274 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(22), eff. September 1, 2023.